Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202079-11,156
Student; receive evidence-based structured literacy instruction.

(1) Beginning with the 2018-19 school year, unless otherwise provided in an individualized education plan for a student receiving special education services, each student who is identified as exhibiting characteristics of dyslexia shall receive evidence-based structured literacy instruction implemented with fidelity using a multisensory approach as provided in the technical assistance document for dyslexia adopted and promulgated by the State Department of Education pursuant to section 79-11,157.

(2) A school district shall not require a student who exhibits characteristics of dyslexia to obtain a medical diagnosis to receive intervention pursuant to this section.

Laws 2018, LB1052, § 1.